District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.16

Applicability.

This part shall apply as of October 1, 2002.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1506, 49 DCR 6968
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 30(b), 51 DCR 881

History

D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.

Effect of Amendments